North Carolina statutes. Chapter 67. Dogs.
Article 1. Owner’s Liability.

§ 67-1.
Liability for injury to livestock or fowls.

If any dog, not being at the time on the premises of the owner or person having charge thereof, shall kill or injure any livestock or fowls, the owner or person having such dog in charge shall be liable for damages sustained by the injury, killing, or maiming of any livestock, and costs of suit.

History.

1911, c. 3, s. 1; C.S., s. 1669.

Cross References.

As to dogfighting, see

G.S. 14-362

.

As to unlawful removal or destruction of electronic dog collars, see

G.S. 14-401.17

.

As to admittance of pets to hotel rooms, see

G.S. 72-7.1

.

As to assistance dogs for handicapped persons, see

G.S. 168-4.2

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on liability of owner for trespass of dogs while hunting, see 33 N.C.L. Rev. 134 (1954).

§ 67-2.
Permitting bitch at large.

If any person owning or having any bitch shall knowingly permit her to run at large during the erotic stage of copulation he shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1862-3, c. 41, s. 2; Code, s. 2501; Rev., s. 3303; C.S., s. 1670; 1993, c. 539, s. 529; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 67-3.
Sheep-killing dogs to be killed.

If any person owning or having any dog that kills sheep or other domestic animals, or that kills a human being, upon satisfactory evidence of the same being made before any judge of the district court in the county, and the owner duly notified thereof, shall refuse to kill it, and shall permit such dog to go at liberty, he shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and the dog may be killed by anyone if found going at large.

History.

1862-3, c. 41, s. 1; 1874-5, c. 108, s. 2; Code, s. 2500; Rev., s. 3304; C.S., s. 1671; 1973, c. 108, s. 24; 1977, c. 597; 1993, c. 539, s. 530; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Cross References.

As to what dogs may be killed, see

G.S. 67-14

.

§ 67-4.
Failing to kill mad dog.

If the owner of any dog shall know, or have good reason to believe, that his dog, or any dog belonging to any person under his control, has been bitten by a mad dog, and shall neglect or refuse immediately to kill the same, he shall forfeit and pay the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) to him who will sue therefor; and the offender shall be liable to pay all damages which may be sustained by anyone, in his property or person, by the bite of any such dog, and shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

R.C., c. 67; Code, s. 2499; Rev., s. 3305; C.S., s. 1672; 1993, c. 539, s. 531; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Cross References.

As to killing mad dogs, see

G.S. 67-14

.

As to rabies, vaccination, etc., generally, see

G.S. 130A-184

et seq.